Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
PART 2 Bid Bonds

13-10-20.
Large public works contracts; requirements for bid bonds; withdrawal of bid.

Bid bonds shall be required for all state public works construction contracts with estimated bids or proposals over $100,000.00; provided, however, that the state or any public board or body of the state may require a bid bond for projects with estimated bids or proposals of $100,000.00 or less.

In the case of competitive sealed bids, except as provided in Code Sections 13-10-22 and 13-10-23, a bid may not be revoked or withdrawn until 60 days after the time set by the state or any public board or body of the state for opening of bids. Upon expiration of such 60 day time period, the bid will cease to be valid, unless the bidder provides written notice to the state prior to the scheduled expiration date that the bid will be extended for a time period specified by the state.

In the case of competitive sealed proposals, the state shall advise offerors in the request for proposals of the number of days that offerors will be required to honor their proposals; provided, however, that if an offeror is not selected within 60 days of opening the proposals, any offeror that is determined by the state to be unlikely of being selected for contract award shall be released from his or her proposal.

If the state requires a bid bond for any public works construction contract, no bid or proposal for a contract with the state shall be valid for any purpose unless the contractor gives a bid bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties approved by the state. The bid bond shall be in the amount of not less than 5 percent of the total amount payable by the terms of the contract. No bid or proposal shall be considered if a proper bid bond or other security authorized in Code Section 13-10-21 has not been submitted. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any bid or proposal for a contract that is required by law to be accompanied by a proposal guaranty and shall not apply to any bid or proposal for a contract with any public agency or body which receives funding from the United States Department of Transportation and which is primarily engaged in the business of public transportation.

When the state invites competitive sealed proposals for a public works construction project and the request for proposals for such project states that price or project cost will not be a selection or evaluation factor, no bid bond shall be required unless the state provides for a bid bond in the request for proposals and specifies the amount of such bond.

Such error in the calculation of his or her bid can be documented by clear and convincing written evidence;

Such error can be clearly shown by objective evidence drawn from inspection of the original work papers, documents, or materials used in the preparation of the bid sought to be withdrawn;

The bidder serves written notice upon the state or the agency or authority of the state which invited proposals for the work prior to the award of the contract and not later than 48 hours after the opening of bids, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays;

The bid was submitted in good faith and the mistake was due to a calculation or clerical error, an inadvertent omission, or a typographical error as opposed to an error in judgment; and

The withdrawal of the bid will not result in undue prejudice to the state or other bidders by placing them in a materially worse position than they would have occupied if the bid had never been submitted.

As a parent corporation;

As a subsidiary corporation;

As a sister corporation;

By common ownership or control; or

By control of one corporation by the other.

The term “bid” shall include proposals.

In any case where two or more affiliated corporations bid for a contract under this Code section and any one or more of such affiliated corporations subsequently rescind or revoke their bid or bids in favor of another such affiliated corporation whose bid is for a higher amount and the contract is awarded at such higher amount to such other affiliated corporation, then the bid bond, proposal guaranty, or other security otherwise required under this article of each affiliated corporation rescinding or revoking its bid shall be forfeited.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 2/SB 179.

The 2013 amendment,

effective May 6, 2013, added subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 13-10-20 as present Code Section 13-10-81.

13-10-21.
Alternatives to bid bond.

In lieu of the bid bond provided for in Code Section 13-10-20, the state may accept a cashier’s check, certified check, or cash in the amount of not less than 5 percent of the total amount payable by the terms of the contract payable to and for the protection of the state.

When the amount of any bid bond required under this article does not exceed $300,000.00, the state may, in its sole discretion, accept an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a bank or savings and loan association, as defined in Code Section 7-1-4, in the amount of and in lieu of the bond otherwise required under Code Section 13-10-20.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 13-10-21 as present Code Section 13-10-82.

13-10-22.
“Bid” and “bidder” defined; appreciable errors in calculation of bids; withdrawing bids.

As used in this Code section, the term “bid” shall include proposals and the term “bidder” shall include offerors.

When receiving bids subject to this article, the state shall permit a bidder to withdraw a bid from consideration after the bid opening without forfeiture of the bid security if the bidder has made an appreciable error in the calculation of his or her bid and if:

In the event that an apparent successful bidder has withdrawn his or her bid as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, action on the remaining bids should be considered as though the withdrawn bid had not been received. In the event the project is relet for bids, under no circumstances shall a bidder who has filed a request to withdraw a bid be permitted to resubmit a bid for the work.

No bidder who is permitted to withdraw a bid pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall for compensation supply any material or labor to, or perform any subcontract or other work agreement for, the person or firm to whom the contract is awarded or otherwise benefit, directly or indirectly, from the performance of the project for which the withdrawn bid was submitted.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-22, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1, effective July 1, 2001, redesignated former Code Section 13-10-22 as present Code Section 13-10-83.

13-10-23.
Affiliated corporations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Affiliated corporation” means, with respect to any corporation, any other corporation related thereto:

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-23, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.

13-10-24.
Maintenance of action on bid bond by obligee.

The obligee in any bid bond required to be given in accordance with this article shall be entitled to maintain an action thereon at any time upon any breach of such bond; provided, however, that no action may be instituted on the bonds or security deposits after one year from the completion of the contract and the acceptance of the public work by the state.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-24, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 820, § 1.